Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-8237
State Trauma Advisory Board; duties.

The State Trauma Advisory Board shall:

(1) Advise the department regarding trauma care needs throughout the state;

(2) Advise the Board of Emergency Medical Services regarding trauma care to be provided throughout the state by emergency medical services;

(3) Review proposed departmental rules and regulations for trauma care; and

(4) Recommend modifications in rules regarding trauma care.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 37;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 99;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 52;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 108.